Hawaii statutes.
§103D-213 Procurement advisory groups. (a)
The chief procurement officer may appoint advisory groups to assist in the
development of specifications or procurement in specific areas, and any other
matters within the authority of the chief procurement officer.

(b) Members of procurement advisory groups may
be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, subject
to such expenditure limitations prescribed by the policy board and applicable
law. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 352, §23]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next